Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2634.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1725-A(a)(2), (3), (5) and (7) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 1725-A. Funding for Charter Schools.--(a) Funding for a charter school shall be provided in the following manner:* * *(2) For non-special education students, the charter school shall receive for each student enrolled no less than the [budgeted] total expenditure per average daily membership [of 12345678910111213141516171819 the prior school year], as defined in section 2501(20), minus the [budgeted] expenditures of the district of residence for nonpublic school programs; adult education programs; community/junior college programs; student transportation services; for special education programs; facilities acquisition, construction and improvement services; and other financing uses, including debt service and fund transfers as provided in the Manual of Accounting and Related Financial Procedures for Pennsylvania School Systems established by the department. This amount shall be paid by the district of residence of each student.(2.1) For the 2027-2028 school year and each school year thereafter, the amount under clause (2) shall be adjusted as follows:(i) The deducted expenditures of the school district shall include tuition paid to charter school entities.(ii) The average daily membership of the school district for students enrolled in a charter school entity shall be deducted from the average daily membership of the school district.(2.2) For the 2027-2028 school year and each school year thereafter, the amount calculated under clause (2) and adjusted under clause (2.1) shall be multiplied by the sum of one (1) and the average of the most recent percentage increase INCREASES in the Statewide average weekly wage and the employment cost index as defined in THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN SECTION 302 OF the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the "Taxpayer Relief Act."(3) [For] Through the 2026-2027 school year, for special education students, the charter school shall receive for each student enrolled the same funding as for each non-special 20260HB2634PN3624 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 education student as provided in clause (2), plus an additional amount determined by dividing the district of residence's total special education expenditure by the product of multiplying the combined percentage of section 2509.5(k) times the district of residence's total average daily membership for the prior school year. This amount shall be paid by the district of residence of each student.(3.1) For the 2027-2028 school year and each school year thereafter, for special education students, the charter school shall receive for each student enrolled an amount, to be paid by the district of residence of each student, equal to the same adjusted amount for each non-special education student determined under clause (2.1) (2.2) , plus an additional amount calculated as follows:(i) Subtract special education payments to charter school entities from the district of residence's total special education expenditure.(ii) Subtract the average daily membership of the school district for special education students enrolled in a charter school entity from the school district of residence's total special education average daily membership.(iii) Divide the amount determined under subclause (i) by the amount determined under subclause (ii).* * *(5) Payments shall be made to the charter school in twelve (12) equal monthly payments, by the fifth day of each month, within the operating school year. A student enrolled in a charter school shall be included in the average daily membership of the student's district of residence for the purpose of providing basic education funding payments and special education 20260HB2634PN3624 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 funding pursuant to Article XXV. If a school district fails to make a payment to a charter school as prescribed in this clause, the secretary shall deduct the estimated amount, as documented by the charter school using the most recently available per-student amount posted under clause (7), from any and all State payments made to the district after receipt of documentation from the charter school. The secretary may not make a deduction on behalf of a charter school unless the documentation from the cyber charter school uses the per-student amount that is posted under clause (7). No later than October 1 of each year, a charter school shall submit to the school district of residence of each student final documentation of payment to be made [based on] using the per-student amount posted under clause (7) and the average daily membership for the students enrolled in the charter school from the school district for the previous school year. If a school district fails to make payment to the charter school, the secretary shall deduct and pay the amount as documented by the charter school using the per-student amount posted under clause (7) from any and all State payments made to the district after receipt of documentation from the charter school from the appropriations for the fiscal year in which the final documentation of payment was submitted to the school district of residence.* * *(7) The following shall apply:(i) Beginning November 1, 2024, [and each year thereafter] through the 2026-2027 school year, each school district shall report the per-student amount to be paid and the component financial data used to calculate the per-student amount to be paid in clauses (2) and (3) and section 1725.1-A for the current 20260HB2634PN3624 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school year in a manner and form prescribed by the department. Any subsequent revision to the information reported under this clause shall be reported to the department within fifteen (15) days of the revision. The department shall post the information received under this clause within thirty (30) days of receipt in an electronic format on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(ii) For the 2027-2028 school year and each school year thereafter, the department shall calculate the per-student amount to be paid using the annual financial report submitted to the department under section 218 for the most recent year available as of the first day of June preceding the school year for which the per-student funding amounts apply. Data fixed on the first day of June shall be revised by the department if it is subsequently found to be incorrect. If a school district has not timely submitted the annual financial report to the department under section 218, the department shall calculate a temporary per-student amount equal to a five per centum growth over the school district's previous year's per-student amount. The department shall post the information under this clause by the fifteenth day of June in an electronic format on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.* * *Section 2. Section 1725.1-A(e)(1) introductory paragraph and (2) introductory paragraph and (f) introductory paragraph of the act, amended November 12, 2025 (P.L.244, No.47), are amended, subsection (e) is amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1725.1-A. Funding for Cyber Charter Schools.--* * *(e) For the 2025-2026 school year and each school year 20260HB2634PN3624 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 thereafter, for non-special education students, a cyber charter school shall receive for each student enrolled an amount calculated as follows:(1) [The] For the 2025-2026 school year, the amount under section 1725-A(a)(2) adjusted as follows:* * *(2) [Multiply] For the 2025-2026 school year, multiply the amount determined under paragraph (1) by the following:* * *(3) For the 2026-2027 school year:(i) The amount under section 1725-A(a)(2) adjusted as follows:(A) The budgeted expenditures of the school district shall include the following additional deductions: tuition paid to cyber charter schools; tax assessment and collection services; eighty per centum of student activities; and eighty per centum of operations and maintenance of plant services.(B) The average daily membership of the school district for students enrolled in a cyber charter school shall be deducted from the average daily membership of the school district.(ii) Multiply the amount determined under subclause (i) by the lesser of one (1) or the amount determined under section 2502.56(d)(2)(ii) for the school district for the most recent year available as of the first day of June preceding the school year for which the per-student amount applies.(4) For the 2027-2028 school year and each school year thereafter:(i) The adjusted amount under section 1725-A(a)(2.1) shall be further adjusted by including the following additional deductions: tuition paid to cyber charter schools; tax 20260HB2634PN3624 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assessment and collection services; eighty per centum of student activities; and eighty per centum of operations and maintenance of plant services.(II) THE AMOUNT CALCULATED UNDER SUBCLAUSE (I) SHALL BE MULTIPLIED BY THE SUM OF ONE (1) AND THE AVERAGE OF THE MOST RECENT PERCENTAGE INCREASES IN THE STATEWIDE AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE AND THE EMPLOYMENT COST INDEX AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN SECTION 302 OF THE ACT OF JUNE 27, 2006 (1ST SP.SESS., P.L.1873, NO.1), KNOWN AS THE "TAXPAYER RELIEF ACT."(ii) (III) Multiply the amount determined under subclause (i) (II) by the lesser of one (1) or the amount determined under section 2502.56(d)(2)(ii) for the school district for the most recent year available as of the first day of June preceding the school year for which the per-student funding amount applies.(f) For the 2025-2026 school year and [each school year thereafter] the 2026-2027 school year, for special education students, a cyber charter school shall receive for each student enrolled the lesser of:* * *(f.1) For the 2027-2028 school year and each school year thereafter, for special education students, a cyber charter school shall receive for each student enrolled the lesser of:(1) the same adjusted amount for each non-special education student AMOUNT determined under section 1725-A(a)(3.1); or (2) the amount determined under subsection (e) (E)(4) for the school district multiplied by one and seventy-one hundredths (1.71).* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment or addition of section 1725.1-A(e)(1) 20260HB2634PN3624 - 7 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 introductory paragraph, (2) introductory paragraph, (3) and (4), (f) introductory paragraph and (f.1) of the act shall take effect immediately.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect July 1, 2027.20260HB2634PN3624 - 8 - 123456